District of Columbia statutes.
47-4807

Compliance.

(a)

The Department, in consultation with the Chief Financial Officer, shall monitor and oversee compliance with the District of Columbia’s Low-Income Housing Tax Credit Program and may promulgate regulations requiring the filing of additional documentation considered necessary to determine continuing eligibility for the District of Columbia low-income housing tax credit.

(b)

The Department or the Chief Financial Officer shall report specific occurrences of noncompliance to appropriate state, federal, and local authorities.

History

Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 7142(b), 61 DCR 9990